California, session 20252026, SB1274.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 27 (commencing with Section 7590) is added to Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, to read: CHAPTER 27. Industrial Cities City7590. (a) “Industrial city” means a city that meets all of the following criteria:(1) The city has a resident population of fewer than 25,000. (2)A majority of the city’s land area is zoned for, or primarily devoted to, industrial, manufacturing, logistics, warehouses, energy production, or other employment-generating commercial uses, rather than residential use.(2) A majority of the city’s jurisdiction is zoned or used for industrial, manufacturing, logistics, warehousing, energy production, or other large-scale commercial use. “Large-scale commercial use” means any commercial use with 250,000 or more square feet of building space.(3) The city supports a daytime workforce that exceeds its resident population.(b)A city meeting the definition in subdivision (a) shall be deemed an industrial city for purposes of any state program, policy, or funding formula that expressly references this section.(b) This section shall not be deemed to modify or affect Chapter 2.8 (commencing with section 65098) of Division 1 of Title 7, including, but not limited to, affecting any special benefit, exemption, exception, or special preference for a development or jurisdiction governed by that chapter.